Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1825.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7(f) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended to read:Section 7. Powers and Duties of the Commission.--The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:* * *<--123456789101112131415161718192021 (f) To initiate, receive, investigate and pass upon complaints charging unlawful discriminatory practices and violations of section 7.1.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 7.1. E mployer Policies and Procedures.--(a) An employer shall adopt written policies and procedures for preventing harassment, discrimination and retaliation against employes. The policies and procedures shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) An explanation that harassment, discrimination and retaliation are unlawful acts under Federal and State law.(2) An explanation that sexual harassment is a form of unlawful discrimination under Federal and State law.(3) A complaint procedure to report and address harassment, discrimination and retaliation claims, including a provision allowing employes to report the claims to persons other than their supervisor.(4) The specific responsibilities of a supervisor in the identification, prevention and reporting of harassment, discrimination and retaliation.(5) An explanation of the procedures for maintaining confidentiality surrounding the reporting of harassment, discrimination and retaliation claims.(6) A procedure for the investigation of claims of harassment, discrimination and retaliation filed by an employe.(7) A PROHIBITION ON MAKING FALSE AND FRIVOLOUS REPORTS OF HARASSMENT, DISCRIMINATION AND RETALIATION, INCLUDING ANY DISCIPLINARY CONSEQUENCES FOR AN EMPLOYE WHO KNOWINGLY MAKES A FALSE OR FRIVOLOUS REPORT.20250HB1825PN2639 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) An employer shall make the policies and procedures under this section available and easily accessible to all employes, and may post COMPLY WITH THIS REQUIREMENT BY POSTING the policies and procedures on the employer's Internet website that is accessible to employes.(c) An employer shall keep records of the current policies and procedures under this section and make them available for inspection by the Commission upon request. If applicable, the employer shall keep a record of the immediately preceding policies and procedures for a period of three years after the effective date of the current policies and procedures and make them available for inspection by the Commission upon request.(d) The Commission shall develop standard policies and procedures that may be used by an employer to satisfy the requirements under clause (a), and shall post the policies and procedures on the Commission's publicly accessible Internet website at no cost to the public. Nothing in this clause shall be construed to require an employer to adopt the standard policies and procedures developed by the Commission, provided that the employer maintains policies and procedures that are consistent with the requirements of clause (a).(e) Within forty-five days of any changes to Federal or State harassment, discrimination or retaliation laws that would impact the standard policies and procedures under clause (d), the Commission shall publish the changes on the Commission's publicly accessible Internet website and transmit notice of the changes to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The Commission shall alert employers of changes to the standard policies and procedures and shall establish and utilize an 20250HB1825PN2639 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronic notification system to issue the alerts. An employer shall adopt the required change to the standard policies and procedures not later than forty-five days after receipt of notification of the change from the Commission.(f) A person claiming a violation of this section may file a complaint with the Commission. The complaint must state the name and address of the employer alleged to have violated this section. If, after investigation by the Commission, the Commission determines the employer violated this section, the Commission shall endeavor to cause compliance with this section and may issue a citation and impose a fine as provided in clause (g).(g) The Commission may issue citations and impose fines on an employer for a violation of this section as follows:(1) A fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first violation.(2) A fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the second or each subsequent violation.(3) Unless an employer has demonstrated willful disregard for the requirements of this section, the Commission shall waive the fine for a first-time violation of this section if the employer proves to the satisfaction of the Commission, not later than sixty days after issuance of the citation, that the violation has been cured. The Commission may CURED. (4) UNLESS AN EMPLOYER HAS DEMONSTRATED WILLFUL DISREGARD FOR THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL waive the fine for a second-time violation of this section if the violation is a result of the employer failing to update policies 20250HB1825PN2639 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and procedures in accordance with clause (e), provided the employer proves to the satisfaction of the Commission, not later than sixty days after issuance of the citation, that the violation has been cured.(h) The Human Relations Training Fund is established as a fund in the State Treasury. The following provisions apply to the fund:(1) A fine imposed and collected by the Commission under clause (g) or a civil penalty assessed under section 9(f)(2) shall be deposited into the Human Relations Training Fund.(2) The money in the Human Relations Training Fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Commission to be used for training, education and outreach.(H) A FINE IMPOSED AND COLLECTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER CLAUSE (G) OR A CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED UNDER SECTION 9(F)(2) SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE GENERAL FUND.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1825PN2639 - 5 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617